North Carolina, session 2025, HB1086.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. CAREER-READY LEAD TEACHER ACADEMY PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.1. The purpose of this Part is to provide alternative pathways to career
advancement in licensed child care. To that end, the North Carolina Partnership for Children,
Inc., in collaboration with the North Carolina Community Colleges System Office, shall develop
and implement a two-year pilot program that expands the child care workforce academies
currently operating in Johnston and Wayne Counties. The pilot program shall establish
career-ready lead teacher academies across the State designed to provide free, comprehensive
training and support to individuals, with no experience or education in child care, who are
interested in pursuing a career in child care.
SECTION 1.2. Local partnerships in the following counties shall participate in the
pilot program described under this Part: Johnston and Wayne. The North Carolina Partnership
for Children, Inc. (NCPC), in collaboration with the Community Colleges System Office, shall
select 10 additional local partnerships to participate in the pilot program with at least one local
partnership selected from each of the four local partnership regions of the statewide Smart Start
network, which regions are the West, Mid-West, Mid-East, and East.
SECTION 1.3. The Community Colleges System Office and local community
colleges shall coordinate to ensure that graduates of the career-ready lead teacher academies meet
all requirements to be credentialed with the North Carolina Early Childhood Credential as lead
teachers in child care in this State.
SECTION 1.4.(a) Each child care career-ready lead teacher academy (academy)
shall seek to enroll no less than 10 students, with a goal of enrolling 15 students in each course.
The academy shall operate up to eight hours per day over a two- to three-week period. A
*H1086-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
participating community college shall strive to offer an academy up to three times per year, with
at least one of the three academies occurring at the end of the traditional public school calendar
year to allow participation by interested high school and college students. The academy shall be
offered free-of-charge to applicants. Students participating in the academy shall receive the
knowledge, skills, and training, including the necessary health screenings, background checks,
and fingerprinting, required for employment as a lead teacher in a licensed child care program in
this State. Upon successful completion of the academy, each student shall receive either a North
Carolina Early Childhood Credential or a Provisional NC Early Childhood Credential that will
enable the student to begin working as either a lead teacher or group leader in a licensed child
care program immediately upon graduation.
SECTION 1.4.(b) A local partnership may provide each graduate with a one-time
stipend. If a one-time stipend for completing the course is provided, the amount shall be at the
discretion of the local partnership but shall not be less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00).
SECTION 1.4.(c) Students shall be eligible to receive an additional one-time stipend
in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500.00) in State funds after completing one year of
employment as a lead teacher in a licensed child care program in this State. To receive the
additional stipend under this subsection, the graduate shall do each of the following:
(1) Begin full-time employment as a lead teacher in a licensed child care center
or licensed family child care home within three months from the date of
graduation from an academy.
(2) Complete the one-year of employment required by this subsection within a
consecutive 12-month period at the same child care program.
SECTION 1.4.(d) The stipends provided under this section shall be available to a
graduate of an academy who is employed by a licensed child care facility in this State, including
a graduate who establishes a licensed family child care home.
SECTION 1.5. The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., and local
partnerships shall (i) collaborate with the community college in the county or counties in which
the local partnership is located, as practicable, to implement the career-ready lead teacher
academy and (ii) ensure information about the career-ready lead teacher academy in the
respective county is made available to the public.
SECTION 1.6. The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc. (NCPC), in
collaboration with the local partnerships and community colleges participating in the pilot
program, shall submit a progress report on the pilot program to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division by March 31, 2027,
with any concerns or recommendations for program expansion. A final report shall be submitted
by December 31, 2027, and shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) The local partnerships and community colleges participating in the pilot
program.
(2) The number of students enrolled in each academy, by county.
(3) The number of students who successfully completed the academy, by county.
(4) The number of newly credentialed graduates employed as lead teachers in
licensed child care programs, by county.
(5) The outcomes achieved from the pilot program, including any
recommendations for expanding the program statewide.
(6) The number of new child care slots available as a result of adding the new
lead teachers.
(7) Total program costs, including any administrative costs borne by the county.
(8) The amount of funds needed to expand the program statewide.
SECTION 1.7. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
one million four hundred seventy-six thousand dollars ($1,476,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
Page 2 House Bill 1086-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., to
provide the State match for implementing the pilot program described in this Part as follows:
(1) The sum of nine hundred seventy-two thousand dollars ($972,000) for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for the State portion of tuition costs.
(2) The sum of five hundred four thousand dollars ($504,000) for the 2026-2027
fiscal year for the stipends provided with State funds in accordance with
Section 1.4 of this Part.
SECTION 1.8. Funds described in Section 1.7 of this Part shall be used in
accordance with the following:
(1) The funds shall be allocated equally among the local partnerships selected to
participate in the pilot program.
(2) Local partnerships shall provide documentation of a twenty-five percent
(25%) local match as a condition of receiving State funds.
(3) Any unexpended and unencumbered funds at the end of the fiscal year from
the funds provided under this Part shall not revert to the General Fund but
shall remain available for use in accordance with this Part.
(4) The funds shall not be used for administrative costs.
(5) The funds are not subject to the administrative cost requirements under
Section 9D.5(b) of S.L. 2023-134, child care services funding requirements
under G.S. 143B-168.15(b), child care subsidy expansion requirements under
G.S. 143B-168.15(g), or match requirements under Section 9D.5(d) of S.L.
2023-134.
SECTION 1.9.(a) As a means to assist younger individuals with a career pathway
to provide child care services, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education (DCDEE), shall establish a Provisional Early Childhood
Credential for individuals who are 16 or 17 years of age and preparing to work in licensed child
care programs in this State. To qualify for the provisional credential, an individual shall complete
an approved early childhood education course offered through a North Carolina public high
school (FE11), a Career and College Promise course (EDU 119), an Intro to School-Age Care
course (EDU 120 or EDU 2120), a Career and College Promise Workforce Continuing Education
pathway (EDU 3119), or Career-Ready Lead Teacher Academy.
SECTION 1.9.(b) By March 31, 2027, the North Carolina Community Colleges
System, the North Carolina Department of Public Instruction (DPI), the North Carolina Center
for Afterschool Programs (NC CAP), and DCDEE shall collaborate to ensure the required child
care health and safety trainings are embedded in each of the courses in subsection (a) of this
section so that individuals who are working to obtain the Provisional Early Childhood Credential
can access the required trainings through structured micro credentials, and, through this
collaboration, DCDEE shall ensure its trainings are available in the Moodle platform. The
Community Colleges System, DPI, NC CAP, and DCDEE shall also collaborate to create
pre-apprenticeship and apprenticeship pathways aligned with the Provisional Early Childhood
Credential. DCDEE shall issue the Provisional Early Childhood Credential to individuals who
meet the requirements established under subsection (a) of this section. The Provisional Early
Childhood Credential shall enable those individuals to work in any out-of-school and summer
programs, including those located at licensed child care facilities, as group leaders as defined in
the child care licensing rules according to the following staff-child ratios and group sizes:

Age Ratio Staff/Children
For a group that includes a child 5 years of age 1/10
For a group of children 6 years of age and older 1/14 to 1/16

House Bill 1086-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
No out-of-school or summer program providing child care pursuant to this section shall care for
more than 25 children in one group. The out-of-school or summer program providing care for 26
or more children shall provide for two or more groups according to the ages of children and shall
provide separate supervisory personnel.
SECTION 1.9.(c) When an individual who has received a provisional credential
pursuant to this section reaches 18 years of age and has obtained a high school diploma or its
equivalent, the individual shall notify the Division of Child Development and Early Education
(Division) of such, if they wish to receive the full Early Childhood Credential, and the Division
shall issue the individual the full North Carolina Early Childhood Credential which shall enable
that individual to be employed as a lead teacher in any licensed child care program in this State.

PART II. CHILD CARE MENTAL AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES
FUNDING
SECTION 2.1.(a) There is appropriated from the ARPA Temporary Savings Fund,
established in Section 1.3(a) of S.L. 2023-7, to the Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc. (NCPC), to expand mental and behavioral health services
for children, families, and staff in child care facility settings and out-of-school programs,
including on-site services and behavioral health supports. The NCPC shall spend the funds
appropriated in this Part in the following budget codes: PSC 5415 Health Care Access and
Support, PSC 5505 Parent Education, PSC 3125 Quality Child Care, and PSC 5509 Parents as
Teachers. The NCPC shall distribute the funds appropriated in this Part to local partnerships, as
determined by the NCPC. These funds shall supplement and not supplant existing Smart Start
partnership behavioral health spending. Funds appropriated in this Part shall not revert at the end
of the 2026-2027 fiscal year but shall remain available for costs associated with mental and
behavioral health initiatives described in this subsection until expended.
SECTION 2.1.(b) The NCPC shall submit a progress report on the mental and
behavioral health initiatives described in subsection (a) of this section to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Secretary of the Department of Health
and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 15, 2027, and a final report by
November 15, 2028. The progress report and final report shall include all of the following:
(1) The name of each local partnership that received funds.
(2) The number of children served by each local partnership.
(3) The types of mental and behavioral health services provided by each local
partnership.
(4) Recommendations for continuing and/or expanding mental and behavioral
health initiatives for children, families, and staff in child care facility settings.
SECTION 2.1.(c) Additional funds allocated in this Part to the North Carolina
Partnership for Children, Inc., from the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Child Development and Early Education, for the 2026-2027 fiscal year are not subject to the
administrative cost requirements under Section 9D.5(b) of S.L. 2023-134, child care services
funding requirements under G.S. 143B-168.15(b), child care subsidy expansion requirements
under G.S. 143B-168.15(g), or match requirements under Section 9D.5(d) of S.L. 2023-134.
SECTION 2.2.(a) G.S. 143B-168.15(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., Special Fund is hereby established
as an interest-bearing, nonreverting special fund in the Department of Health and Human
Services. Funds appropriated from the General Fund to the Department for Smart Start and the
North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc. (NCPC), shall be deposited in the Fund and shall
be used by the NCPC and local partnerships exclusively for the purposes authorized in this
section, unless otherwise expressly provided by law. State funds allocated to local partnerships
Page 4 House Bill 1086-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
that are unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available to the
North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., to reallocate to local partnerships. Notwithstanding
G.S. 147-86.11 or any other provision of law to the contrary, the NCPC shall be allowed to hold
cash in excess of incurred expenditures at the end of each fiscal year up to five million dollars
($5,000,000). Not later than August 15 of each year, the NCPC shall provide to the Department
of Health and Human Services a financial status report for the preceding fiscal year that includes
all actual expenditures and remaining cash on hand."
SECTION 2.2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART III. CHILD CARE REFORMS/CHILD CARE CENTER ADMINISTRATORS
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 110-91(8) is amended by adding the following sub-subdivisions
to read:
"a1. A licensed child care center may use the combined education and work
experience of two staff persons to meet the requirements for Level II
and Level III certificates or designation for the NC Early Childhood
Administration Credential certificate established by the Commission
and shall receive the same quality rating improvement system (QRIS)
credit toward a star-rated license as the center would receive if the
requirements were met by one staff person. To meet the requirements
of this sub-subdivision, the following requirements must be met:
1. One individual must complete EDU 261 and EDU 262 as set
out in the Child Care Rules in the Administrative Code, or the
equivalent, or hold an associate degree or higher in business
administration or a related field, or have at least two years of
verifiable business or administrative work experience.
2. One individual must (i) hold an associate degree or bachelor's
of science degree in early childhood education or child
development as designated by the Commission, (ii) be
responsible for the center's curriculum, program delivery, and
compliance practices, and (iii) be physically on-site for at least
the minimum number of hours required by the child care
staffing requirements set out under the Child Care Rules in the
Administrative Code.
a2. The Department shall allow an individual to earn the minimum
mandatory North Carolina Early Childhood Administration Credential
without completing coursework in EDU 261 and EDU 262, or the
equivalent of both, when the individual has (i) an associate degree or
higher in business administration or a related field or (ii) two years of
verifiable business or administrative work experience."
SECTION 3.2. This Part is effective when it becomes law.

PART IV. STUDY INSURANCE PROGRAM FOR CHILD CARE PROVIDERS
SECTION 4.1.(a) The Department of Insurance shall utilize a consulting firm, an
actuarial firm, a brokerage firm, or any combination thereof to study the feasibility of establishing
liability insurance coverage, including State-supported captive insurance, risk-pooling, joint
underwriting association, joint reinsurance, or other organizations, for North Carolina child care
providers in order to provide liability insurance coverage to participating child care providers,
which has the potential to support risk distribution while promoting strong governance and shared
accountability. All of the following shall be part of the study undertaken in accordance with this
subsection:
House Bill 1086-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The collection of loss data and operational information from child care
providers statewide in order to estimate program feasibility, premium
requirements, and necessary surplus levels.
(2) An evaluation of the viability of a program that is designed primarily to
provide general liability coverage, including a focus on sexual abuse and
molestation (SAM) coverage, whether offered separately or bundled.
(3) A determination of the amount of public funding needed to initially capitalize
the insurer and an exploration of potential alternative solutions to that public
funding.
(4) An analysis of conditions in the traditional, excess and surplus (E&S), and
unauthorized foreign reinsurance markets, including costs, affordability,
availability of liabilities coverages, and the barriers that child care providers
experience in accessing adequate liability coverage.
(5) A determination of whether commercial insurance carriers would be willing
to participate in this program, including discussion of developing an assigned
risk pool.
(6) The recommended design for the most viable program for North Carolina
child care providers.
(7) Identification of any legislative changes necessary to implement any
recommendations contained within the report, including any funding
recommendations.
SECTION 4.1.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall cooperate
with the Department of Insurance, and any entity with which the Department of Insurance has
contracted, for the purposes of supplying any information necessary to conduct the study required
by this section.
SECTION 4.1.(c) No later than June 1, 2027, the Department of Insurance shall
submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government with the
findings of the study required by this section.
SECTION 4.1.(d) Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Insurance the sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the purposes of conducting the study
required by this section.

PART V. UPDATE BIDDING REQUIREMENTS FOR SMART START
SECTION 5.1. Section 9D.5(e) of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 9D.5.(e) Bidding. – The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., and all
local partnerships shall use competitive bidding practices in contracting for goods and services
on contract amounts as follows:
(1) For amounts of five fifteen thousand dollars ($5,000) ($15,000) or less, the
procedures specified by a written policy as developed by the Board of
Directors of the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.
(2) For amounts greater than five fifteen thousand dollars ($5,000) ($15,000) but
less than fifteen twenty-five thousand dollars ($15,000), ($25,000), three
written quotes.
(3) For amounts of fifteen twenty-five thousand dollars ($15,000) ($25,000) or
more but less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), a request for proposal
process.process with solicitation in appropriate venues, including, but not
limited to, websites, major newspaper portals, or other options to ensure a
strong competitive process.
(4) For amounts of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, a request for
proposal process and advertising in a major newspaper."
Page 6 House Bill 1086-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1,
2026.
House Bill 1086-Second Edition Page 7